Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2871.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 29-360, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE29-360. Construction and application This chapter shall be so applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this the uniform limited partnership act among states enacting it.